apertium-jpn.jpn.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Japanese

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<pn%>  ! Proper noun
%<v%>	! Verb
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<cnjcoo%> ! Coordinating conjunction
%<ij%>  ! Interjection
%<prn%> ! Pronoun
%<cop%>	! Copula
%<num%> ! Numeral
%<det%> ! Determiner

%<dem%> ! Demonstrative

%<top%> ! toponym (should probably be changed?)

%<attr%> ! for na adjectives

%<pref%> ! prefix

%<suff%> ! suffix

%<emot%> ! emoticon

%<spec%> ! special

! Particles
%<tpc%> ! Topic
%<nom%>  ! Nominative
%<gen%>  ! Genitive
%<acc%>  ! Accusative
%<dat%>  ! Dative
%<quot%> ! Quotative
%<all%> ! Allative
%<abl%>  ! Ablative
%<ins%>  ! Instrumental
%<com%>  ! Comitative
%<term%> ! Terminative
%<mod%>  ! For final particles
%<abs%>  ! For things that don't have postpositions

! -alisers
%<nz%>  ! Nominaliser
%<az%>  ! Adverbaliser
%<vz%>  ! Verbaliser

! Pronoun-related
%<p1%>   ! First person
%<p2%>   ! Second person
%<p3%>   ! Third person
%<pers%> ! Personal

! verb suffixes
%<vol%>  ! Volitional
%<neg%>  ! Negative
%<past%> ! Past
%<imp%>  ! Imperative
%<npst%> ! Non-past
!conditional?
%<caus%>  ! Causative
%<pot%>   ! Potential
%<pass%>  ! Passive
%<cvb_te%> ! te form, because I don't know what it is
%<prog%> ! progressive

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

! Formality
%<pol%>	! Polite
%<ifml%>! Informal

!Punctuation
%<sent%>
%<cm%>
%<lquot%>
%<rquot%>
%<lpar%>
%<rpar%>

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%{っ%} ! for use in ta and te form
%{a%} ! for use in neg form
%{た%} ! for use in ta form
%{て%} ! for te form
%{i%} ! for adverbial form

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;

ProperNouns ;

VerbRoot ;

AdjRoot ;

Pronouns ;

Conjunctions ;

Determiners ;

!Interjections ;

Adverbs ;

Digits ;

Numbers ;

Emoticon ;

Special ;

Prefix ;

Suffix ;

Copula ;

Punctuation ;


LEXICON NounTag
%<n%>: NounPl ;

LEXICON NPTop
%<pn%>%<top%>: NounInfl ;
%<pn%>%<top%>%+人:%>人 NounInfl ; ! person (effectively, citizen) じん
%<pn%>%<top%>%+軍:%>軍 NounInfl ; ! military ぐん
%<pn%>%<top%>%+国内:%>国内 NounInfl ; ! domestic こくない

LEXICON NounPl
%<sg%>: NounInfl ;
%<pl%>:%>たち NounInfl ;

LEXICON iAdj
%<adj%>%<npst%>:%>い #;
%<adj%>%+です%<cop%>%<pol%>%<npst%>:%>いです FinPart ;
%<adj%>%<ifml%>%<past%>:%>かった FinPart ;
%<adj%>%<ifml%>%<npst%>%<neg%>:%>くない FinPart ;
%<adj%>%<ifml%>%<past%>%<neg%>:%>くなかった FinPart ;
%<adj%>%<az%>:%>く # ;


LEXICON naAdjTag
%<adj%>: NounInfl ;
%<adj%>%<attr%>:%>な # ;

LEXICON NounInfl
%<cop%>%<pol%>%<npst%>:%>です FinPart ;
%<cop%>%<ifml%>%<npst%>:%>だ FinPart ;
%<pol%>%<cop%>%<past%>:%>でした FinPart ;
%<ifml%>%<cop%>%<past%>:%>だった FinPart ;
PostPos ;

LEXICON PostPos
%<tpc%>:%>は # ;
%<tpc%>:%>なら # ;
%<tpc%>:%>ったら # ;
%<tpc%>:%>って # ;
%<tpc%>:%>も # ;
%<tpc%>:%>さえ # ;
%<tpc%>:%>でも # ;
%<tpc%>:%>すら # ;
%<tpc%>:%>だって # ;
%<tpc%>:%>まで # ;
%<tpc%>:%>だけ # ;
%<tpc%>:%>ばかり # ;
%<tpc%>:%>ばっかり # ;
%<tpc%>:%>ばっか # ;
%<tpc%>:%>のみ # ;
%<tpc%>:%>しか # ;
%<tpc%>:%>こそ # ;
%<tpc%>:%>など # ;
%<tpc%>:%>なんか # ;
%<tpc%>:%>なんて # ;
%<tpc%>:%>なんぞ # ;
%<tpc%>:%>位 # ;
%<tpc%>:%>くらい # ;
%<tpc%>:%>ぐらい # ;
%<tpc%>:%>どころ # ;
%<tpc%>:%>とて # ;
%<tpc%>:%>じゃ # ;
%<nom%>:%>が # ;
%<nom%>:%>が # ;
%<nom%>:%>を # ;
%<nom%>:%>に # ;
%<nom%>:%>から # ;
%<nom%>:%>と # ;
%<nom%>:%>で # ;
%<nom%>:%>へ # ;
%<nom%>:%>まで # ;
%<nom%>:%>より # ;
%<nom%>:%>の # ;
%<nom%>:%>にて # ;
%<nom%>:%>っと # ;
%<gen%>:%>の # ;
%<acc%>:%>を # ;
%<dat%>:%>に # ;
%<quot%>:%>と # ;
%<abl%>:%>から # ;
%<ins%>:%>で # ;
%<com%>:%>の # ;
%<com%>:%>と # ;
%<com%>:%>や # ;
%<com%>:%>および # ;
%<com%>:%>及び # ;
%<com%>:%>ならびに # ;
%<com%>:%>並びに # ;
%<com%>:%>も # ;
%<com%>:%>やら # ;
%<com%>:%>だの # ;
%<com%>:%>に # ;
%<com%>:%>か # ;
%<com%>:%>かも # ;
%<com%>:%>なり # ;
%<com%>:%>または # ;
%<com%>:%>又は # ;
%<com%>:%>また # ;
%<com%>:%>又 # ;
%<com%>:%>かつ # ;
%<com%>:%>かつまた # ;
%<com%>:%>もしくは # ;
%<com%>:%>若しくは # ;
%<com%>:%>あるいは # ;
%<com%>:%>或いは # ;
%<com%>:%>ないしは # ;
%<com%>:%>乃至は # ;
%<com%>:%>ないし # ;
%<com%>:%>乃至 # ;
%<com%>:%>そして # ;
%<com%>:%>それとも # ;
%<com%>:%>し # ;
%<com%>:%>が # ;
%<com%>:%>なら # ;
%<com%>:%>けど # ;
%<com%>:%>けども # ;
%<com%>:%>けれど # ;
%<com%>:%>けれども # ;
%<com%>:%>から # ;
%<com%>:%>まで # ;
%<com%>:%>より # ;
%<com%>:%>まま # ;
%<com%>:%>きり # ;
%<com%>:%>っきり # ;
%<com%>:%>つつ # ;
%<com%>:%>ながら # ;
%<com%>:%>やいなや # ;
%<com%>:%>ど # ;
%<com%>:%>ども # ;
%<com%>:%>きや # ;
%<all%>:%>へ # ;
%<all%>:%>に # ;
%<term%>:%>まで # ;
! mo
! ya
%<abs%>: # ;

LEXICON FinPart
%+わ%<mod%>:%>わ # ; !
%+よ%<mod%>:%>よ # ; ! Informing the hearer
%+ね%<mod%>:%>ね # ; ! Emphasis
%+か%<mod%>:%>か # ; ! Question
%+さ%<mod%>:%>さ # ;
%+さあ%<mod%>:%>さあ # ;
%+か%<mod%>:%>か # ;
%+かしら%<mod%>:%>かしら # ;
%+ね%<mod%>:%>ね # ;
%+ネ%<mod%>:%>ネ # ;
%+ねえ%<mod%>:%>ねえ # ;
%+な%<mod%>:%>な # ;
%+よ%<mod%>:%>よ # ;
%+ヨ%<mod%>:%>ヨ # ;
%+やろ%<mod%>:%>やろ # ;
%+ぞ%<mod%>:%>ぞ # ;
%+ぜ%<mod%>:%>ぜ # ;
%+で%<mod%>:%>で # ;
%+なあ%<mod%>:%>なあ # ;
%+わ%<mod%>:%>わ # ;
%+ねん%<mod%>:%>ねん # ;
%+っけ%<mod%>:%>っけ # ;
%+や%<mod%>:%>や # ;
%+かい%<mod%>:%>かい # ;

LEXICON UVerbInflCP
%<v%>: UVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<caus%>:%>%{a%}せ RuVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<pass%>:%>%{a%}れ RuVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{a%}せられ RuVerbInfl ;

LEXICON RuVerbInflCP
%<v%>: RuVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<caus%>:%>させ RuVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<pass%>:%>られ RuVerbInfl ;
%<v%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>させられ RuVerbInfl ;

LEXICON UVerbInfl
%<ifml%>%<npst%>: PostShortForm ;
%<ifml%>%<past%>:%>%{っ%}%{た%} PostShortForm ;
%<ifml%>%<npst%>%<neg%>:%>%{a%}ない PostShortForm ;
%<ifml%>%<past%>%<neg%>:%>%{a%}なかった PostShortForm ;
%<pol%>%<npst%>:%>%{i%}ます # ;
%<pol%>%<past%>:%>%{i%}ました # ;
%<pol%>%<npst%>%<neg%>:%>%{i%}ません # ;
%<pol%>%<past%>%<neg%>:%>%{i%}ませんでした # ;
%<cvb_te%>:%>%{っ%}%{て%} # ; ! needs to go to a post-te lexicon

LEXICON RuVerbInfl
%<ifml%>%<npst%>:%>る PostShortForm ;
%<ifml%>%<past%>:%>た PostShortForm ;
%<ifml%>%<npst%>%<neg%>:%>ない PostShortForm ;
%<ifml%>%<past%>%<neg%>:%>なかった PostShortForm ;
%<pol%>%<npst%>:%>ます # ;
%<pol%>%<past%>:%>ました # ;
%<pol%>%<npst%>%<neg%>:%>ません # ;
%<pol%>%<past%>%<neg%>:%>ませんでした # ;
%<cvb_te%>:%>て PostTeForm ;

LEXICON PostTeForm
# ;
%<prog%>:%>いる # ; ! this needs to get inflected

LEXICON PostShortForm
# ;
%<nz%>:%>こと NounInfl ;

LEXICON LOOP
%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, POST-DIGITS ;
%.:%. POST-DIGITS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      POST-DIGITS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX
%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

LEXICON POST-DIGITS
%<num%>: PostPos ;
年%<num%>:年 PostPos ; ! year ねん
月%<num%>:月 PostPos ; ! month がつ
日%<num%>:日 PostPos ; ! day にち
時%<num%>:時 PostPos ; ! hour じ
分%<num%>:分 PostPos ; ! minute ぶん
秒%<num%>:秒 PostPos ; ! second びょう



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON AdjRoot
静か:静か naAdjTag ; ! しずか　quiet
多い:多い iAdj ; ! おおい　many
様々:様々 naAdjTag ; ! さまざま various
必要:必要 naAdjTag ; ! ひつよう necessary
相対的:相対的 naAdjTag ; ! そうたいてき relative
最終的:最終的 naAdjTag ; ! さいしゅうてき final

LEXICON VerbRoot
食べる:食べる RuVerbInflCP ; ! eat
落とす:落とす UVerbInflCP ; ! drop
含む:含む UVerbInflCP ; ! include
向ける:向け UVerbInflCP ; ! turn
残る:残る UVerbInflCP ; ! remain
呼ぶ:呼ぶ UVerbInflCP ; ! call (something a name/yell out) よぶ
使う:使う UVerbInflCP ; ! つかう use
持つ:持つ UVerbInflCP ; ! もつ carry
行う:行う UVerbInflCP ; ! おこなう occur
死ぬ:死ぬ UVerbInflCP ; ! die
する%<v%>%<ifml%>%<npst%>:する PostShortForm ; ! do
する%<v%>%<pol%>%<npst%>:します # ;
する%<v%>%<cvb_te%>:して # ;
する%<v%>%<caus%>:させ RuVerbInfl ;
する%<v%>%<pass%>:され RuVerbInfl ;

LEXICON NounRoot
あいじん:あいじん NounTag ;
悪運:悪運 NounTag ;
足並み:足並み NounTag ;
あとのまつり:あとのまつり NounTag ;
雨かんむり:雨かんむり NounTag ;
暗まく:暗まく NounTag ;
いくじ:いくじ NounTag ;
い住い:い住い NounTag ;
いちぶしじゅう:いちぶしじゅう NounTag ;
一点ばり:一点ばり NounTag ;
意表:意表 NounTag ;
陰影:陰影 NounTag ;
う飼い:う飼い NounTag ;
打ち掛:打ち掛 NounTag ;
泳:泳 NounTag ;
遠けい:遠けい NounTag ;
おうよう:おうよう NounTag ;
御じ儀:御じ儀 NounTag ;
オムレツ:オムレツ NounTag ;
かい革:かい革 NounTag ;
開びゃく:開びゃく NounTag ;
拡充:拡充 NounTag ;
かしわ:かしわ NounTag ;
かっぽう着:かっぽう着 NounTag ;
乾風:乾風 NounTag ;
かんさ:かんさ NounTag ;
完封:完封 NounTag ;
学歴:学歴 NounTag ;
寄金:寄金 NounTag ;
きど哀楽:きど哀楽 NounTag ;
きゅう世:きゅう世 NounTag ;
きょうそうきょく:きょうそうきょく NounTag ;
切通し:切通し NounTag ;
ぎ太夫:ぎ太夫 NounTag ;
腐れえん:腐れえん NounTag ;
胡桃:胡桃 NounTag ;
けいさい:けいさい NounTag ;
けっそう:けっそう NounTag ;
けん地:けん地 NounTag ;
限界:限界 NounTag ;
こうえき:こうえき NounTag ;
高進:高進 NounTag ;
こう物:こう物 NounTag ;
こくろん:こくろん NounTag ;
小旗:小旗 NounTag ;
コード:コード NounTag ;
際:際 NounTag ;
先ぶれ:先ぶれ NounTag ;
莢:莢 NounTag ;
さんれつ:さんれつ NounTag ;
しお干がり:しお干がり NounTag ;
しせき:しせき NounTag ;
しにぎわ:しにぎわ NounTag ;
しゃめん:しゃめん NounTag ;
終列車:終列車 NounTag ;
主夫:主夫 NounTag ;
しょうしん:しょうしん NounTag ;
しょく託:しょく託 NounTag ;
しれい:しれい NounTag ;
しんちく:しんちく NounTag ;
事故:事故 NounTag ;
じぶつ:じぶつ NounTag ;
じゅしょう:じゅしょう NounTag ;
上奏:上奏 NounTag ;
人とく:人とく NounTag ;
双六:双六 NounTag ;
せいあつ:せいあつ NounTag ;
精通:精通 NounTag ;
せっきょう:せっきょう NounTag ;
潜航:潜航 NounTag ;
占りょう:占りょう NounTag ;
前例:前例 NounTag ;
そう方向:そう方向 NounTag ;
素よう:素よう NounTag ;
たいか:たいか NounTag ;
たい焼:たい焼 NounTag ;
縦じく:縦じく NounTag ;
たんぺん:たんぺん NounTag ;
ダミー:ダミー NounTag ;
父上:父上 NounTag ;
中略:中略 NounTag ;
ちょっけつ:ちょっけつ NounTag ;
土偏:土偏 NounTag ;
体裁:体裁 NounTag ;
てっぺん:てっぺん NounTag ;
店名:店名 NounTag ;
投降:投降 NounTag ;
と競走:と競走 NounTag ;
泊まりがけ:泊まりがけ NounTag ;
どうめい:どうめい NounTag ;
ないやしゅ:ないやしゅ NounTag ;
成り金:成り金 NounTag ;
日本間:日本間 NounTag ;
姉ちゃん:姉ちゃん NounTag ;
農工:農工 NounTag ;
はい虚:はい虚 NounTag ;
はくり多売:はくり多売 NounTag ;
はつ荷:はつ荷 NounTag ;
版:版 NounTag ;
幕府:幕府 NounTag ;
ひきうす:ひきうす NounTag ;
人攫い:人攫い NounTag ;
拍子ぬけ:拍子ぬけ NounTag ;
美容院:美容院 NounTag ;
複線:複線 NounTag ;
ふてき:ふてき NounTag ;
武芸:武芸 NounTag ;
プール:プール NounTag ;
片りん:片りん NounTag ;
ほうしょう:ほうしょう NounTag ;
仏:仏 NounTag ;
坊主:坊主 NounTag ;
前評ばん:前評ばん NounTag ;
真向かい:真向かい NounTag ;
水掛ろん:水掛ろん NounTag ;
みゃく絡:みゃく絡 NounTag ;
無配:無配 NounTag ;
綿花:綿花 NounTag ;
物思い:物思い NounTag ;
やくぶん:やくぶん NounTag ;
優越:優越 NounTag ;
ゆぶん:ゆぶん NounTag ;
ようりょくそ:ようりょくそ NounTag ;
鎧戸:鎧戸 NounTag ;
リクエスト:リクエスト NounTag ;
良識:良識 NounTag ;
霊園:霊園 NounTag ;
老きょう:老きょう NounTag ;
輪切り:輪切り NounTag ;
LEXICON ProperNouns
小林:小林 NPTop ;
橋本:橋本 NPTop ;
青木:青木 NPTop ;
中田:中田 NPTop ;
竹内:竹内 NPTop ;
手塚:手塚 NPTop ;
宮沢:宮沢 NPTop ;
大津:大津 NPTop ;
西:西 NPTop ;
谷口:谷口 NPTop ;
近江:近江 NPTop ;
古賀:古賀 NPTop ;
飯塚:飯塚 NPTop ;
宮川:宮川 NPTop ;
浅田:浅田 NPTop ;
相馬:相馬 NPTop ;
瀬川:瀬川 NPTop ;
岸本:岸本 NPTop ;
桑田:桑田 NPTop ;
大浦:大浦 NPTop ;
古木:古木 NPTop ;
富岡:富岡 NPTop ;
中沢:中沢 NPTop ;
上山:上山 NPTop ;
乾:乾 NPTop ;
吉見:吉見 NPTop ;
菊川:菊川 NPTop ;
豊岡:豊岡 NPTop ;
角:角 NPTop ;
深沢:深沢 NPTop ;
岩下:岩下 NPTop ;
松林:松林 NPTop ;
藤島:藤島 NPTop ;
高坂:高坂 NPTop ;
石崎:石崎 NPTop ;
田嶋:田嶋 NPTop ;
関川:関川 NPTop ;
山名:山名 NPTop ;
外山:外山 NPTop ;
河上:河上 NPTop ;
梶:梶 NPTop ;
梅沢:梅沢 NPTop ;
山谷:山谷 NPTop ;
保科:保科 NPTop ;
氏家:氏家 NPTop ;
滝口:滝口 NPTop ;
田所:田所 NPTop ;
川畑:川畑 NPTop ;
安野:安野 NPTop ;
宮武:宮武 NPTop ;
河崎:河崎 NPTop ;
尾田:尾田 NPTop ;
徹:徹 NPTop ;
薫:薫 NPTop ;
孝:孝 NPTop ;
美智子:美智子 NPTop ;
淳子:淳子 NPTop ;
正明:正明 NPTop ;
英子:英子 NPTop ;
信夫:信夫 NPTop ;
康夫:康夫 NPTop ;
美和:美和 NPTop ;
敦:敦 NPTop ;
昌子:昌子 NPTop ;
聡子:聡子 NPTop ;
栄一:栄一 NPTop ;
昭子:昭子 NPTop ;
賢:賢 NPTop ;
桃子:桃子 NPTop ;
和明:和明 NPTop ;
光夫:光夫 NPTop ;
沙織:沙織 NPTop ;
敏行:敏行 NPTop ;
悠:悠 NPTop ;
聖:聖 NPTop ;
利彦:利彦 NPTop ;
房子:房子 NPTop ;
博行:博行 NPTop ;
紀夫:紀夫 NPTop ;
勝弘:勝弘 NPTop ;
信明:信明 NPTop ;
哲史:哲史 NPTop ;
菜穂子:菜穂子 NPTop ;
了:了 NPTop ;
万里:万里 NPTop ;
政治:政治 NPTop ;
都:都 NPTop ;
富士子:富士子 NPTop ;
安雄:安雄 NPTop ;
克明:克明 NPTop ;
清香:清香 NPTop ;
繁夫:繁夫 NPTop ;
元治:元治 NPTop ;
鉄夫:鉄夫 NPTop ;
良太郎:良太郎 NPTop ;
佐智子:佐智子 NPTop ;
祐美:祐美 NPTop ;
高弘:高弘 NPTop ;
大里:大里 NPTop ;
多古:多古 NPTop ;
稲城:稲城 NPTop ;
高座:高座 NPTop ;
岩船:岩船 NPTop ;
丹生:丹生 NPTop ;
南牧:南牧 NPTop ;
野沢温泉:野沢温泉 NPTop ;
浜松:浜松 NPTop ;
昭和:昭和 NPTop ;
肝属:肝属 NPTop ;
八重山:八重山 NPTop ;
高輪:高輪 NPTop ;
アンカラ:アンカラ NPTop ;
デンマーク:デンマーク NPTop ;
エストニア:エストニア NPTop ;
ハラレ:ハラレ NPTop ;
ブリュッセル:ブリュッセル NPTop ;
マレ:マレ NPTop ;
ブルキナファソ:ブルキナファソ NPTop ;
河南:河南 NPTop ;
バチカン:バチカン NPTop ;
サンノゼ:サンノゼ NPTop ;
ＥＤＲ:ＥＤＲ NPTop ;
表千家:表千家 NPTop ;
国鉄:国鉄 NPTop ;
積水ハウス:積水ハウス NPTop ;
ＮＡＴＯ:ＮＡＴＯ NPTop ;
ミサワ:ミサワ NPTop ;
イスラム:イスラム NPTop ;
